Utah statutes.
63C-7-203.    Establishment of the Utah Communications Agency Network Board
-- Terms -- Vacancies.
(1)  There is created the Utah Communications Agency Network Board.
(2)  The board is comprised of one member representative selected by each
member, and the state representatives selected as provided in Subsection
63C-7-205(2).  Each member representative shall serve until removed for any
reason and replaced by the governing body of the member.
(3)  The chair and secretary of the executive committee shall also serve as
the chair and secretary of the board.
